Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1725
Employer or other payor; prohibited actions; penalty.

An employer or other payor shall not use an income withholding notice or order or the possibility of income withholding as a basis for (1) discrimination in hiring, (2) demotion of an employee or payee, (3) disciplinary action against an employee or payee, or (4) termination of an employee or payee.

Upon application by the county attorney or authorized attorney and after a hearing on the matter, the court may impose a civil fine of up to five hundred dollars for each violation of this section.

An employer or other payor who violates this section may be required to make full restitution to the aggrieved employee or payee, including reinstatement and backpay.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 19.